Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.420

Subject to student education loan servicer requirements—Exempt from licensing.

(1) The following are subject to the student education loan servicer requirements in this chapter, but are exempt from having to obtain and maintain a license in accordance with this chapter:

(a) Trade, technical, vocational, or apprentice programs that teach skills related to a specific job, and postsecondary schools that service their own student education loans;

(b) Persons servicing five or fewer student education loans;

(c) Guarantors of federal student loans that do not also service federal student loans;

(d) The United States or any department or agency thereof, to the extent it is servicing student education loans that it originated; and

(e) Any state, county, city, or any department or agency thereof, but only to the extent it is servicing student education loans that it originated.

(2) Persons providing third-party student education loan modification services are exempt from having to obtain and maintain a license in accordance with this chapter.

(3) The department may refer to the attorney general's consumer protection division complaints regarding entities subject to this section.

[ 2018 c 62 s 10.]